Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
STATUTE REVISION AND PUBLICATION

Note

Uniform electronic legal material act, see chapter 98.

§23G-11 Revisor of statutes. The
director of the office of the legislative reference bureau, or a member of the
staff of the bureau delegated by the director, shall be the revisor of statutes
of the State. [L Sp 1977 1st, c 8, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next